West Virginia, session 2026, HB4923.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 27. PREVENTION AND TREATMENT OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE. §48-27-502. Mandatory provisions in protective order. (a) A protective order must order the respondent to refrain from abusing, harassing, stalking, threatening or otherwise intimidating the petitioner or the minor children, or engaging in other conduct that would place the petitioner or the minor children in reasonable fear of bodily injury.(b) The protective order must prohibit the respondent from possessing any firearm or ammunition, subject to the provisions of subsection (f) of this section.(c) The protective order must inform the respondent that he or she is prohibited from possessing any firearm or ammunition and that possession of a firearm or ammunition while subject to the court's protective order is a criminal offense under state and federal law, notwithstanding the fact that the respondent might otherwise have a right to possess a firearm.(d) The protective order must inform the respondent that the order is in full force in every county of this state.(e) The protective order must contain on its face the following statement, printed in bold-faced type or in capital letters:"VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER MAY BE PUNISHED BY CONFINEMENT IN A REGIONAL JAIL FOR AS LONG AS ONE YEAR AND BY A FINE OF AS MUCH AS $2,000".(f) Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, a protective order may not prohibit a respondent from possessing any firearm or ammunition or confiscate any firearm or ammunitions owned by the respondent:(1) Unless there is a full adversarial hearing before a court of record, with the respondent present with legal representation; and (2) There is clear and convincing evidence that the respondent poses an immediate danger to the petitioner, established by documented threats, sworn testimony, or other substantial evidence, and that the confiscation of firearms and ammunition is not used as a punitive or retaliatory measure in domestic violence proceedings. (g) If a protective order is granted containing the mandatory language of this section, the respondent has an automatic appeal from that order which shall be heard by the court within 10 days as provided in §48-27-510.